morphology/foma/tagalog-v02.foma
### tagalog-v02.foma ###

read lexc tagalog-v02.lexc
define Lexicon ;

# Vowels
define V [ a | e | i | o | u ] ;

# Consonants
define C [ b | c | d | f | g | h | j | k | l | m | n | p | q | r | s | t | v | w | x | y | z | %'] ;


# Reduplication: first syllable is duplicated in imperfective and prospective verbs
define RedupRightBound  [..] -> %> || .#. (C) V _ ?* %^ d u p ?* ;
define RedupLeftBound   [..] -> %< || .#. _ (C) V %> ?* %^ d u p ?* ;
define RedupAddCV       [..] -> %< C V %> || .#. _ %< C V %> ?* %^ d u p ?* ;
define RedupAddV        [..] -> %< V %> || .#. _ %< V %> ?* %^ d u p ?* ;
define RedupOperation   RedupRightBound .o.
                        RedupLeftBound  .o.
                        RedupAddCV      .o.
                        RedupAddV       ;

define RedupFilter      _eq(Lexicon .o. RedupOperation, %<, %>) ;
define RedupClean       %< | %> | %^ d u p -> 0 ;
define Reduplication    RedupFilter     .o.
                        RedupClean      ;


# Affixation: voiced verbs receive corresponding affix
define AffixActiveUm        [..] -> %< u m %> || .#. (C) _ V  ?* %^ u m ?* ;
define AffixActiveUmPsp     %< u m %> -> 0 || ?* _ ?* %^ p s p ?* ;

define AffixActiveNag       [..] -> %< n a g %> || .#. _ ?* %^ n a g ?* ;
define AffixActiveNagV      [..] -> %- || .#. %< n a g _ %> V ?* ;
define AffixActiveMag       n -> m || .#. %< _ a g ?* %^ p s p ?* ;

define AffixPassiveIn       [..] -> %< i n %> || .#. (C) _ V  ?* %^ i n ?* ;
define AffixPassiveInPsp1   %< i n %> -> 0 || ?* _ ?* %^ p s p ?* ;
define AffixPassiveInPsp2   [..] -> %< i n %> || ?* _ (%^ ?*) %^ i n %^ p s p ?* ;
define AffixPassiveInOU     o -> u || ?* _ (C) %< i n %> ?* ;
define AffixPassiveHin      [..] -> h || .#. ?+ V %< _ i n %> ?* ;

define AffixClean           %< | %> | %^ u m | %^ i n | %^ n a g | %^ p s p -> 0 ;

define Affixation       AffixActiveUm       .o.
                        AffixActiveUmPsp    .o.
                        AffixActiveNag      .o.
                        AffixActiveNagV     .o.
                        AffixActiveMag      .o.
                        AffixPassiveIn      .o.
                        AffixPassiveInPsp1  .o.
                        AffixPassiveInPsp2  .o.
                        AffixPassiveInOU    .o.
                        AffixPassiveHin     .o.
                        AffixClean          ;


regex Reduplication .o. Affixation;
